California statutes. Penal Code
(b) If a psychiatrist determines that an inmate should be treated with psychiatric medication, but the inmate does not consent, the inmate may be involuntarily treated with the medication. Treatment may be given on either a nonemergency basis as provided in subdivision (c), or on an emergency or interim basis as provided in subdivision (d). Any such treatment shall be consistent with the standard of care.

(c) A county department of mental health, or other designated
 county department, may administer involuntary medication on a nonemergency basis only if all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) A psychiatrist or psychologist has determined that the inmate has a serious mental disorder.

(2) A psychiatrist or psychologist has determined that, as a result of that mental disorder, the inmate is gravely disabled and does not have the capacity to refuse treatment with psychiatric medications, or is a danger to self or others.

(3) A psychiatrist has prescribed one or more psychiatric medications for the treatment of the inmate’s disorder, has considered the risks, benefits, and treatment alternatives to involuntary medication, and has determined that the treatment alternatives
 to involuntary medication are unlikely to meet the needs of the patient.

(4) The inmate has been advised of the risks and benefits of, and treatment alternatives to, the psychiatric medication and refuses, or is unable to consent to, the administration of the medication.

(5) The jail has made a documented attempt to locate an available bed for the inmate in a noncarceral treatment facility in lieu of seeking to administer involuntary medication. The jail shall transfer that inmate to such a facility only if the facility can provide care for the mental health needs, and the physical health needs, if any, of the inmate and upon the agreement of the facility. In enacting the act that added this paragraph, it is the intent of the Legislature to recognize the lack of
 noncarceral treatment beds and the inability of many facilities to accept transfers from correctional facilities. Submission of a declaration under penalty of perjury is sufficient for the county to demonstrate a documented attempt to locate an available bed.

(6) The inmate is provided a hearing before a superior court judge, a court-appointed commissioner or referee, or a court-appointed hearing officer, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 5334 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(A) If the inmate is in custody awaiting trial, including an inmate whose criminal proceedings are suspended pursuant to Section 1370 or an inmate whose competence has been called into question and is undergoing evaluation pursuant to Section 1369, any hearing pursuant to this section shall be held
 before, and any requests for ex parte orders shall be submitted to, a judge in the superior court where the criminal case is pending.

(B) A superior court judge may consider whether involuntary medication would prejudice the inmate’s defense.

(7) (A) The inmate is provided counsel at least 21 days prior to the hearing, unless emergency or interim medication is being administered pursuant to subdivision (d), in which case the inmate would receive expedited access to counsel.

(B) In the case of an inmate awaiting arraignment, the inmate is provided counsel within 48 hours of the filing of the notice of the hearing with the superior court, unless counsel has previously been appointed.

(C) The hearing shall be held not more than 30 days after the filing of the notice with the superior court, unless counsel for the inmate agrees to extend the date of the hearing.

(8) (A) The inmate and counsel are provided with written notice of the hearing at least 21 days prior to the hearing, unless emergency or interim medication is being administered pursuant to subdivision (d), in which case the inmate would receive an expedited hearing.

(B) The written notice shall do all of the following:

(i) Set forth the diagnosis, the factual basis for the diagnosis, the basis upon which psychiatric medication is recommended, the expected
 benefits of the medication, any potential side effects and risks to the inmate from the medication, and any alternatives to treatment with the medication.

(ii) Advise the inmate of the right to be present at the hearing, the right to be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings, the right to present evidence, and the right to cross-examine witnesses. Counsel for the inmate shall have access to all medical records and files of the inmate, but shall not have access to the confidential section of the inmate’s central file which contains materials unrelated to medical treatment.

(iii) Inform the inmate of their right to appeal the determination to the superior court or the court of appeal as specified in subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 5334 of the Welfare and Institutions
 Code, and their right to file a petition for writ of habeas corpus with respect to any decision of the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, to continue treatment with involuntary medication after the superior court judge, court-appointed commissioner or referee, or court-appointed hearing officer has authorized treatment with involuntary medication.

(9) (A) In the hearing described in paragraph (6), the superior court judge, a court-appointed commissioner or referee, or a court-appointed hearing officer determines by clear and convincing evidence that the inmate has a mental illness or disorder, that, as a result of that illness, the inmate is gravely disabled and lacks the capacity to consent to or refuse treatment with psychiatric medications or is a danger to self or others if not
 medicated, that there is no less intrusive alternative to involuntary medication, and that the medication is in the inmate’s best medical interest.

(B) The superior court judge, court-appointed commissioner or referee, or a court-appointed hearing officer shall not make a finding pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph that there is no less intrusive alternative to involuntary medication and that the medication is in the inmate’s best medical interest, without information from the jail to indicate that neither of the conditions specified in paragraph (5) is present.

(C) If the court makes the findings in subparagraph (A), that administration shall occur in consultation with a psychiatrist who is not involved in the treatment of the inmate at the jail, if available.

(D) In the event of any statutory notice issues with either initial or renewal filings by the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, the superior court judge, court-appointed commissioner or referee, or court-appointed
 hearing officer shall hear arguments as to why the case should be heard, and shall consider factors such as the ability of the inmate’s counsel to adequately prepare the case and to confer with the inmate, the continuity of care, and, if applicable, the need for protection of the inmate or institutional staff that would be compromised by a procedural default.

(10) The historical course of the inmate’s mental disorder, as determined by available relevant information about the course of the inmate’s mental disorder, shall be considered when it has direct bearing on the determination of whether the inmate is a danger to self or others, or is gravely disabled and incompetent to refuse medication as the result of a mental disorder.

(11) An inmate is entitled to file one motion
 for reconsideration following a determination that they may receive involuntary medication, and may seek a hearing to present new evidence, upon good cause shown. This paragraph does not prevent a court from reviewing, modifying, or terminating an involuntary medication order for an inmate awaiting trial if there is a showing that the involuntary medication is interfering with the inmate’s due process rights in the criminal proceeding.

(d) (1) (A) This section does not prohibit a physician from taking appropriate action in an emergency. An emergency exists when both of the following criteria are met:

(i) There is a sudden and marked change in an inmate’s mental condition so that action is immediately necessary for the preservation of
 life or the prevention of serious bodily harm to the inmate or others.

(ii) It is impractical, due to the seriousness of the emergency, to first obtain informed consent.

(B) If psychiatric medication is administered during an emergency, the medication shall only be that which is required to treat the emergency condition and shall be administered for only so long as the emergency continues to exist.

(2) (A) If the clinicians of the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, identify a situation that jeopardizes the inmate’s health or well-being as the result of a serious mental illness, and necessitates the continuation of medication beyond the initial 72 hours
 pending the full mental health hearing, the county department may seek to continue the medication by giving notice to the inmate and their counsel of its intention to seek an ex parte order to allow the continuance of medication pending the full hearing, and filing an ex parte order within the initial 72-hour period. Treatment of the inmate in a facility pursuant to Section 4011.6 shall not be required in order to continue medication pursuant to this subdivision unless the treatment is otherwise medically necessary.

(B) The notice shall be served upon the inmate and counsel at the same time the inmate is given the written notice that the involuntary medication
 proceedings are being initiated and is appointed counsel as provided in subdivision (c).

(C) The order may be issued ex parte upon a showing that, in the absence of the medication, the emergency conditions are likely to recur. The request for an ex parte order shall be supported by an affidavit from the psychiatrist or psychologist showing specific facts.

(D) The inmate and the inmate’s appointed counsel shall have two business days to respond to the county department’s ex parte request to continue interim medication, and may present facts supported by an affidavit in opposition to the department’s request. A superior court judge, a court-appointed commissioner or referee, or a court-appointed hearing officer shall review the ex parte request and shall have three business days
 to determine the merits of the department’s request for an ex parte order.

(E) If an order is issued, the psychiatrist may continue the administration of the medication until the hearing described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) is held.

(3) If the county elects to seek an ex parte order pursuant to this subdivision, the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, shall file with the superior court, and serve on the inmate and their counsel, the written notice described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (c) within 72 hours of commencing medication pursuant to this subdivision, unless either of the following occurs:

(A) The inmate gives informed consent to continue the medication.

(B) A psychiatrist determines that the psychiatric medication is not necessary and administration of the medication is discontinued.

(4) If medication is being administered pursuant to this subdivision, the hearing described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) shall commence within 21 days of the filing and service of the notice, unless counsel for the inmate agrees to a different period of time.

(5) With the exception of the timeline provisions specified in paragraphs (3) and (4) for providing notice and commencement of the hearing in emergency or interim situations, the inmate shall be entitled to and be given the same due process protections as specified in subdivision (c). The county department of mental health,
 or other designated county department, shall prove the same elements supporting the involuntary administration of psychiatric medication and the superior court judge, court-appointed commissioner or referee, or court-appointed hearing officer shall be required to make the same findings described in subdivision (c).

(e) (1) (A) An order by the court authorizing involuntary medication of an inmate shall be valid for no more than one year after the date of determination.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), in the case of an inmate who is awaiting arraignment, trial, or sentencing, the determination that an inmate may receive involuntary medication shall be valid for no more than 180 days. The court shall review the order at intervals of
 not more than 60 days to determine whether the grounds for the order remain. At each review, the psychiatrist shall file an affidavit with the court that ordered the involuntary medication affirming that the person who is the subject of the order continues to meet the criteria for involuntary medication. A copy of the affidavit shall be provided to the defendant and the defendant’s attorney. In determining whether the criteria for involuntary medication still exist, the court shall consider the affidavit of the psychiatrist or psychiatrists and any supplemental information provided by the defendant’s attorney. The court may also require the testimony from the psychiatrist, if necessary. The court, at each review, may continue the order authorizing involuntary medication, vacate the order, or make any other appropriate order.

(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), any determination of an inmate’s incapacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication made pursuant to this section shall remain in effect only until one of the following occurs, whichever occurs first:

(A) The duration of the inmate’s confinement ends, unless, pursuant to Section 1370, the inmate is transferred to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, as defined in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If the inmate is transferred to such a facility, the order shall remain valid for the period ordered by the court and the facility may administer antipsychotic medication as needed, including on an involuntary basis, if the treating psychiatrist determines that antipsychotic medication is medically necessary and appropriate.

(B) A court determines that the inmate no longer meets the criteria of subdivision (c) or (d), or by any other order of the court.

(3) An inmate’s period of confinement may not be extended in order to provide treatment to the inmate with antipsychotic medication pursuant to this section.

(f) This section does not prohibit the court, upon making a determination that an inmate awaiting arraignment, preliminary hearing, trial, sentencing, or a postconviction proceeding to revoke or modify supervision may receive involuntary medication pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d), and, upon ex parte request of the defendant or counsel, from suspending all proceedings in the criminal prosecution, until the court determines that the
 defendant’s medication will not interfere with their ability to meaningfully participate in the criminal proceedings.

(g) If a determination has been made to involuntarily medicate an inmate pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d), the medication shall be discontinued one year after the date of that determination, unless the inmate gives informed consent to the administration of the medication, or unless a new determination is made pursuant to the procedures set forth in subdivision (h).

(h) To renew an existing order allowing involuntary medication, the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, shall file with the superior court, and shall serve on the inmate and their counsel, a written notice indicating the department’s intent to renew the existing
 involuntary medication order.

(1) The request to renew the order shall be filed and served no later than 21 days prior to the expiration of the current order authorizing involuntary medication.

(2) The inmate shall be entitled to, and shall be given, the same due process protections as specified in subdivision (c).

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), renewal orders shall be valid for one year from the date of the hearing.

(B) In the case of an inmate awaiting arraignment, trial, or sentencing, the renewal order shall be valid for no more than 180 days. The court shall review the order at intervals of not more than 60 days to
 determine whether the grounds for the order remain. At each review, the psychiatrist shall file an affidavit with the court that ordered the involuntary medication affirming that the person who is the subject of the order continues to meet the criteria for involuntary medication. A copy of the affidavit shall be provided to the defendant and the defendant’s attorney. In determining whether the criteria for involuntary medication still exist, the court shall consider the affidavit of the psychiatrist or psychiatrists and any supplemental information provided by the defendant’s attorney. The court may also require the testimony from the psychiatrist, if necessary. The court, at each review, may continue the order authorizing involuntary medication, vacate the order, or make any other appropriate order.

(4) (A) An order
 renewing an existing order shall be granted based on clear and convincing evidence that the inmate has a serious mental disorder that requires treatment with psychiatric medication, and that, but for the medication, the inmate would revert to the behavior that was the basis for the prior order authorizing involuntary medication, coupled with evidence that the inmate lacks insight regarding their need for the medication, such that it is unlikely that the inmate would be able to manage their own medication and treatment regimen. No new acts need be alleged or proven.

(B) The superior court judge, court-appointed commissioner or referee, or a court-appointed hearing officer shall also make a finding that treatment of the inmate in a correctional setting continues to be necessary if neither of the criteria in paragraph (5) of subdivision
 (c) is present.

(5) If the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, wishes to add a basis to an existing order, it shall give the inmate and the inmate’s counsel notice in advance of the hearing via a renewal notice or supplemental petition. Within the renewal notice or supplemental petition, as described in subdivision (h), the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, shall specify what additional basis is being alleged and what qualifying conduct within the past year supports that additional basis. The county department of mental health, or other designated county department, shall prove the additional basis and conduct by clear and convincing evidence at a hearing as specified in subdivision (c).

(6) The
 hearing on any petition to renew an order for involuntary medication shall be conducted prior to the expiration of the current order.

(i) In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this section and the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code), this section shall control.

(j) Each county that, between January 1, 2025 and July 1, 2028, administers involuntary medication to any inmate awaiting arraignment, trial, or sentencing, shall, by no later than January 1, 2029, prepare and submit a written report to the Assembly Committee on Public Safety and the Senate Committee on Public Safety, summarizing all of the following information:

(1) The number of inmates who were administered involuntary medication while awaiting arraignment, trial, or sentencing between January 1, 2025, and July 1, 2028.

(2) The crime for which each of these inmates was arrested, if it is practically feasible to obtain that information.

(3) The total time each inmate was detained while awaiting arraignment, trial, or sentencing, if it is practically feasible to obtain that information.

(4) The duration of the administration of involuntary medication for each inmate.

(5) The number of times, if any, that each existing order for the administration of involuntary medication was renewed.

(6) The reason that administration of involuntary medication was terminated for each inmate.

(k) As used in this section, “inmate” means a person confined in the county jail, including, but not limited to, a person sentenced to imprisonment in a county jail, a person housed in a county jail during or awaiting trial proceedings, and a person who has been booked into a county jail and is awaiting arraignment.

(l) This section does not apply to a person housed in a county jail solely on the basis of an immigration hold, except as it applies to medication provided on an emergency or interim basis as provided in subdivision (d).

(m) This section shall remain in
 effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which is chaptered before that date, deletes or extends the date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 49) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 326, Sec. 1.   (SB 1317)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 326.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no person sentenced to imprisonment in a county jail shall be administered any psychiatric medication without prior informed consent.

(b) If a psychiatrist determines that an inmate should be treated with psychiatric medication, but the inmate does not consent, the inmate may be involuntarily treated with the medication. Treatment may be given on either a nonemergency basis as provided in subdivision (c), or on an emergency or interim basis as provided in subdivision (d).

(c) A county department of mental health, or other designated county department, may seek to initiate involuntary
 medication on a nonemergency basis only if all of the following conditions
 have been met:

(1) A psychiatrist or psychologist has determined that the inmate has a serious mental disorder.

(2) A psychiatrist or psychologist has determined that, as a result of that mental disorder, the inmate is gravely disabled and does not have the capacity to refuse treatment with psychiatric medications, or is a danger to self or others.

(3) A psychiatrist has prescribed one or more psychiatric medications for the treatment of the inmate’s disorder, has considered the risks, benefits, and treatment alternatives to involuntary medication, and has determined that the treatment alternatives to involuntary medication are unlikely to meet the needs of the patient.

(4) The inmate has been advised of the risks and benefits of, and treatment alternatives to, the psychiatric medication, and refuses, or is unable to consent to, the administration of the medication.

(5) The inmate is provided a hearing before a superior court judge, a court-appointed commissioner or referee, or a court-appointed hearing officer, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 5334 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(6) The inmate is provided counsel at least 21 days prior to the hearing, unless emergency or interim medication is being administered pursuant to subdivision (d), in which case the inmate would receive expedited access to counsel. The hearing shall be held not more than 30 days after the
 filing of the notice with the superior court, unless counsel for the inmate agrees to extend the date of the hearing.

(7) The inmate and counsel are provided with written notice of the hearing at least 21 days prior to the hearing, unless emergency or interim medication is being administered pursuant to subdivision (d), in which case the inmate would receive an expedited hearing. The written notice shall do all of the following:

(A) Set forth the diagnosis, the factual basis for the diagnosis, the basis upon which psychiatric medication is recommended, the expected benefits of the medication, any potential side effects and risks to the inmate from the medication, and any alternatives to treatment with the medication.

(B) Advise the inmate of the right to be present at the hearing, the right to be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings, the right to present evidence, and the right to cross-examine witnesses. Counsel for the inmate shall have access to all medical records and files of the inmate, but shall not have access to the confidential section of the inmate’s central file which contains materials unrelated to medical treatment.

(C) Inform the inmate of the right to appeal the determination to the superior court or the court of appeal as specified in subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 5334 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and of the right to file a petition for writ of habeas corpus with respect to any decision of the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, to continue treatment
 with involuntary medication after the superior court judge, court-appointed commissioner or referee, or court-appointed hearing officer has authorized treatment with involuntary medication.

(8) A superior court judge, a court-appointed commissioner or referee, or a court-appointed hearing officer determines by clear and convincing evidence that the inmate has a mental illness or disorder, that as a result of that illness the inmate is gravely disabled and lacks the capacity to consent to or refuse treatment with psychiatric medications or is a danger to self or others if not medicated, that there is no less intrusive alternative to involuntary medication, and that the medication is in the inmate’s best medical interest. In the event of any statutory notice issues with either initial or renewal filings by the county department of mental
 health, or other designated county department, the superior court judge, court-appointed commissioner or referee, or court-appointed hearing officer shall hear arguments as to why the case should be heard, and shall consider factors such as the ability of the inmate’s counsel to adequately prepare the case and to confer with the inmate, the continuity of care, and, if applicable, the need for protection of the inmate or institutional staff that would be compromised by a procedural default.

(9) The historical course of the inmate’s mental disorder, as determined by available relevant information about the course of the inmate’s mental disorder, shall be considered when it has direct bearing on the determination of whether the inmate is a danger to self or others, or is gravely disabled and incompetent to refuse medication as the result
 of a mental disorder.

(10) An inmate is entitled to file one motion for reconsideration following a determination that they may receive involuntary medication, and may seek a hearing to present new evidence, upon good cause shown.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit a physician from taking appropriate action in an emergency. An emergency exists when there is a sudden and marked change in an inmate’s mental condition so that action is immediately necessary for the preservation of life or the prevention of serious bodily harm to the inmate or others, and it is impractical, due to the seriousness of the emergency, to first obtain informed consent. If psychiatric medication is administered during an emergency, the medication shall only be that which is required to
 treat the emergency condition and shall be administered for only so long as the emergency continues to exist. If the clinicians of the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, identify a situation that jeopardizes the inmate’s health or well-being as the result of a serious mental illness, and necessitates the continuation of medication beyond the initial 72 hours pending the full mental health hearing, the county department may seek to continue the medication by giving notice to the inmate and their counsel of its intention to seek an ex parte order to allow the continuance of medication pending the full hearing. Treatment of the inmate in a facility pursuant to Section 4011.6 shall not be required in order to continue medication
 pursuant to this subdivision unless the treatment is otherwise medically necessary. The notice shall be served upon the inmate and counsel at the same time the inmate is given the written notice that the involuntary medication proceedings are being initiated and is appointed counsel as provided in subdivision (c). The order may be issued ex parte upon a showing that, in the absence of the medication, the emergency conditions are likely to recur. The request for an ex parte order shall be supported by an affidavit from the psychiatrist or psychologist showing specific facts. The inmate and the inmate’s appointed counsel shall have two business days to respond to the county department’s ex parte request to continue interim medication, and may present facts supported by an affidavit in opposition to the department’s request. A superior court judge, a court-appointed
 commissioner or referee, or a court-appointed hearing officer shall review the ex parte request and shall have three business days to determine the merits of the department’s request for an ex parte order. If an order is issued, the psychiatrist may continue the administration of the medication until the hearing described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) is held.

(1) If the county elects to seek an ex parte order pursuant to this subdivision, the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, shall file with the superior court, and serve on the inmate and their counsel, the written notice described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) within 72 hours of commencing medication pursuant to this subdivision, unless either of the following occurs:

(A) The inmate gives informed consent to continue the medication.

(B) A psychiatrist determines that the psychiatric medication is not necessary and administration of the medication is discontinued.

(2) If medication is being administered pursuant to this subdivision, the hearing described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) shall commence within 21 days of the filing and service of the notice, unless counsel for the inmate agrees to a different period of time.

(3) With the exception of the timeline provisions specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) for providing notice and commencement of the hearing in emergency or interim situations, the inmate shall be entitled to and be given the same due process
 protections as specified in subdivision (c). The county department of mental health, or other designated county department, shall prove the same elements supporting the involuntary administration of psychiatric medication, and the superior court judge, court-appointed commissioner or referee, or court-appointed hearing officer shall be required to make the same findings described in subdivision (c).

(e) The determination that an inmate may receive involuntary medication shall be valid for one year from the date of the determination, regardless of whether the inmate subsequently gives informed consent.

(f) If a determination has been made to involuntarily medicate an inmate pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d), the medication shall be discontinued one year after the date of
 that determination, unless the inmate gives informed consent to the administration of the medication, or unless a new determination is made pursuant to the procedures set forth in subdivision (g).

(g) To renew an existing order allowing involuntary medication, the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, shall file with the superior court, and shall serve on the inmate and their counsel, a written notice indicating the department’s intent to renew the existing involuntary medication order.

(1) The request to renew the order shall be filed and served no later than 21 days prior to the expiration of the current order authorizing involuntary medication.

(2) The inmate shall be
 entitled to, and shall be given, the same due process protections as specified in subdivision (c).

(3) Renewal orders shall be valid for one year from the date of the hearing.

(4) An order renewing an existing order shall be granted based on clear and convincing evidence that the inmate has a serious mental disorder that requires treatment with psychiatric medication, and that, but for the medication, the inmate would revert to the behavior that was the basis for the prior order authorizing involuntary medication, coupled with evidence that the inmate lacks insight regarding their need for the medication, such that it is unlikely that the inmate would be able to manage their own medication and treatment regimen. No new acts need be alleged or proven.

(5) If the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, wishes to add a basis to an existing order, it shall give the inmate and the inmate’s counsel notice in advance of the hearing via a renewal notice or supplemental petition. Within the renewal notice or supplemental petition, as described in subdivision (g), the county department of mental health, or other designated county department, shall specify what additional basis is being alleged and what qualifying conduct within the past year supports that additional basis. The county department of mental health, or other designated county department, shall prove the additional basis and conduct by clear and convincing evidence at a hearing as specified in subdivision (c).

(6) The hearing on any petition
 to renew an order for involuntary medication shall be conducted prior to the expiration of the current order.

(h) In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this section and the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), this section shall control.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 434, Sec. 12) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 326, Sec. 2.   (SB 1317)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Section operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2603, if an individual has been found incompetent to stand trial after having been charged with a misdemeanor offense, as described in Section 1370.01,
 and is confined in the county jail, antipsychotic medication may be administered without their prior informed consent only in the following circumstances:

(1) An emergency, as defined by either subdivision (m) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or subdivision (d) of Section 2603 of the Penal Code.

(A) In the case of an emergency, antipsychotic medication may, despite the individual’s objection, be administered before a capacity hearing if the medication is necessary to address the emergency condition and is administered in the least restrictive manner, only for the duration of the emergency, and in no case for more than 72 hours, except as provided by subparagraph (B).

(B) If a
 psychiatrist determines that continued administration of antipsychotic medication is necessary beyond the initial 72 hours and the individual does not consent to take the medication voluntarily, the psychiatrist may petition the superior court in the county where the individual is confined to order continued treatment with antipsychotic medication. The petition and a written notice, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), shall be filed within the initial 72-hour period that the antipsychotic medication is administered and served on the individual and their counsel.

(2) (A) Upon a court’s determination that the
 individual is gravely disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and that the individual does not have the capacity to consent to or refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication. The fact that an individual has temporary access to food, clothing, shelter, personal safety, and necessary medical care while incarcerated is not a basis to conclude that the individual is able to provide for their basic personal needs for food, clothing, shelter, personal safety, or necessary medical care, which shall be evaluated based upon the individual’s ability to provide for those needs while not incarcerated. The court shall consider opinions in the reports prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, as applicable to the issue of whether the individual lacks the capacity to make decisions
 regarding the administration of antipsychotic medication, and shall proceed as follows:

(i) The court shall conduct a hearing before a superior court judge, a court-appointed commissioner or referee, or a court-appointed hearing officer, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 5334 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to determine whether any of the following is true:

(I) Based upon the opinion of the psychiatrist or licensed psychologist offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, the individual lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication, the individual’s mental disorder requires medical treatment with antipsychotic medication, and, if the individual’s mental disorder is not treated with antipsychotic medication, it is
 probable that serious harm to the physical or mental health of the individual will result. Probability of serious harm to the physical or mental health of the individual requires evidence that the individual is presently suffering adverse effects to their physical or mental health, or the individual has previously suffered these effects as a result of a mental disorder and their condition is substantially deteriorating. The fact that an individual has a diagnosis of a mental disorder does not alone establish probability of serious harm to the physical or mental health of the individual.

(II) Based upon the opinion of the psychiatrist or licensed psychologist offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, the individual is a danger to others, in that the individual has inflicted, attempted to inflict, or made a serious
 threat of inflicting substantial physical harm on another while in custody, or the individual had inflicted, attempted to inflict, or made a serious threat of inflicting substantial physical harm on another that resulted in the individual being taken into custody, and the individual presents, as a result of mental disorder or mental defect, a danger of inflicting substantial physical harm to others.

(ii) (I) If the court finds the conditions described in subclause (I) or (II) of clause (i) to be true, and has considered the conditions in subdivision (c), and if, pursuant to the opinion offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, a psychiatrist has opined that treatment with antipsychotic medication may be appropriate for the individual, the court may issue an order authorizing the administration of
 antipsychotic medication as needed, including on an involuntary basis, to be administered under the direction and supervision of a licensed psychiatrist.
